Utah, session 2026, SB159.
Section 1. Section 53G-9-216 is enacted to read:53G-9-216. Dyslexia screening.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Dyslexia" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53E-4-307.(b)"Large school district" means a school district:(i)with more than 3,000 students; or(ii)located in a county of the first, second, or third class, as described in Section 17-60-104.(c)"Public school" means a:(i)district school; or(ii)charter school.(d)"Regional education service agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-4-410.(e)"Small school district" means a school district:(i)with 3,000 students or fewer; or(ii)located in a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class, as described in Section 17-60-104.(2)A large school district shall:(a)administer a dyslexia screener to a student enrolled in a public school in:(i)kindergarten;(ii)grade 1; and(iii)grade 2;(b)administer the dyslexia screener described in Subsection (2)(a) at least once during each school year for the applicable grade level; and(c)use the funds the state board allocates under Subsection (8) to:(i)hire one full-time equivalent employee whose primary responsibility is to administer a dyslexia screener and coordinate screening activities within the large school district, in accordance with the requirements of this section; and(ii)cover other costs associated with the requirements of this section.(3)(a)A regional education service agency shall:(i)administer a dyslexia screener to:(A)each student enrolled in a small school district; and(B)upon request, a student enrolled at a charter school in accordance with Subsection (4); and(ii)use the funds the state board allocates under Subsection (8) to:(A)hire one full-time equivalent employee whose primary responsibility is to administer a dyslexia screener and coordinate screening activities within the regional education service agency, in accordance with the requirements of this section; and(B)cover other costs associated with the requirements of this section.(b)A small school district shall use the small school district's regional education service agency to administer the dyslexia screener required under Subsection (3)(a).(4)A charter school may, voluntarily or upon the request of a parent of a student enrolled in the charter school, through the charter school's regional education service agency, administer a dyslexia screener to a student in:(a)kindergarten;(b)grade 1; or(c)grade 2.(5)(a)A parent of a student enrolled at a public school, in grades kindergarten through grade 2, may request a dyslexia screening for the parent's student regardless of whether a public school has administered a screener to the student in accordance with this section.(b)A parent of a student enrolled in the following programs may request that the state board screen the parent's student for dyslexia:(i)a home school program;(ii)the Carson Smith Opportunity Scholarship Program, established in Section 53E-7-402;(iii)the Statewide Online Education Program, created in Section 53F-4-502; or(iv)the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program, established in Section 53F-6-402.(6)A school district or regional education service agency may select and administer any dyslexia screener that:(a)aligns with state board rule; and(b)complies with the requirements of this section.(7)For a student whom a district or charter school screens for dyslexia under this section and who demonstrates characteristics of dyslexia, the district or charter school shall comply with the requirements of Subsection 53E-4-307(4)(a).(8)The state board shall:(a)subject to legislative appropriations, distribute funds to each large school district and each regional educational service agency to comply with the requirements of this section;(b)employ or contract with personnel who can administer a dyslexia screener to the students described in Subsection (5)(b); and(c)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules to:(i)create a process to identify reliable and effective dyslexia screeners for use under this section; and(ii)comply with the requirements of this section.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.